Massachusetts, session 194th, S1897.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
Part 1 – Title IV – Chapter 32 – Section 4 is hereby amended by inserting the following 
at the end of the 14th paragraph: "For the purpose of determining regular annual compensation 
for retirement, a veteran, who has also served as a member of the State Staff for the previous 3 
years, as defined in Chapter 33, Section 15, shall be entitled to provide makeup payments, for the 
amount of wages that had been characterized as a housing or subsistence allowance for each year 
of creditable service where such allowance was not included as part of regular annual 
compensation contribution, of an amount equal to the ten percent of such housing or subsistence 
allowance that was then not included in the veteran’s compensation calculation."